District of Columbia statutes.
6-1108

Application for preliminary review.

(a)

An applicant may apply to the Mayor for a preliminary review of a project for compliance with the provisions of this subchapter relating to new construction, and to any demolition, alteration, or subdivision necessary for such new construction. Upon the provision of such information and upon compliance with such other conditions as the Mayor may require, such application shall be considered by the Mayor without the necessity of the applicant completing other permit requirements not necessary for a finding under this subchapter. Where an application for a preliminary review is received pursuant to this section, the Mayor will determine, in accordance with the procedures and requirements specified in §§ 6-1104, 6-1105, 6-1106, and/or 6-1107, as applicable, whether to issue a preliminary finding of compliance with this subchapter; provided, that no permit shall be granted except in accordance with all other permit requirements, and after final review by the Mayor under this subchapter; provided further, that where the final review shows that the project is not consistent with the preliminary review, the application will again be processed in accordance with the procedures and requirements of §§ 6-1104, 6-1105, 6-1106, and/or 6-1107, as applicable.

(b)

A prospective permit applicant may apply to the Historic Preservation Review Board for conceptual review of a project for compliance with the provisions of this subchapter relating to demolition, alteration, subdivision, or new construction. After receipt of such information as it may require, the Review Board shall consider the application without requiring the applicant to complete other permit requirements not necessary for its review. To assist in conducting conceptual review, the Review Board may appoint advisory committees composed of two or more Review Board members.

(c)

The Mayor shall not determine compliance with § 6-1104, § 6-1105, § 6-1106, or § 6-1107 based on an application for conceptual review, but the Mayor may consider the Review Board’s recommendation on an application for conceptual review as evidence to support a finding on a related application submitted for review under § 6-1104, § 6-1105, § 6-1106, or § 6-1107.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 9, 25 DCR 6939
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(k), 53 DCR 6712
Apr. 30, 2015, D.C. Law 20-249, § 2(e), 62 DCR 1512

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1008.
1973 Ed., § 5-828.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-185 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-249 would have added “in accordance with this subsection and § 6-1108.03” in (a) and (b); and would have added (a-1) and (b-1).

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-69 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 11 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter,” where applicable, in this section.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-249: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-249 provided that (1) the act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.